New York, session 2025-2026, S6552.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph c of paragraph 5 of subdivision 41 of section 2 375 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 71 of the laws 3 of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (c)(i) In addition to the amber light authorized to be displayed 5 pursuant to paragraph three of this subdivision, one or more rear-facing 6 green lights or combination green and amber lights may be affixed to a 7 hazard vehicle designed for ice and snow removal owned and operated by 8 the state or by a county, city, town or village. Such green light or 9 lights may be displayed on a hazard vehicle designed for ice and snow 10 removal owned and operated by the state or by a county, city, town or 11 village when such vehicle is engaged in a hazardous operation and is 12 also displaying the amber light or lights required to be displayed 13 during a hazardous operation pursuant to paragraph three of this subdi- 14 vision. Green lights or combination green and amber lights authorized 15 by this subparagraph shall be displayed and directed only in a rear-fac- 16 ing manner. Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall be deemed to 17 authorize the use of green lights on hazard vehicles designed for ice 18 and snow removal owned and operated by the state or by a county, city, 19 town or village unless such hazard vehicles also display one or more 20 amber lights as otherwise authorized in this subdivision. 21 (ii) (A) Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall be deemed to 22 authorize the use of: 23 (1) green lights or a combination of green and amber lights on 24 privately-owned vehicles utilized for ice and snow removal unless such 25 vehicles are owned and operated by a party to a written contract with EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10919-01-5 S. 6552 2 1 the state or with a county, city, town or village providing for ice and 2 snow removal on the roads of the municipality, and such vehicle is to be 3 used for that purpose within the municipality to which the contract 4 pertains at the time the lights are on; or 5 (2) a device displaying combination green and white flashing lights on 6 privately-owned vehicles utilized for ice and snow removal. 7 (B) Any such privately-owned vehicle under contract as described in 8 this clause shall be subject to the restrictions of clause (i) of this 9 subparagraph with respect to the display, usage and period of operation 10 of such lights. Any person violating the provisions of this clause 11 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. 12 (iii) The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regu- 13 lations relating to the use, placement, power and display of green 14 lights on a hazard vehicle designed for ice and snow removal owned and 15 operated by the state or by a county, city, town or village. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 18 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 19 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 20 on or before such effective date.